Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 4 Garnishment Forms

18-4-70.
Required use of forms.

For the purpose of this chapter, the forms contained in this article shall be required to be used; provided, however, that a party may use its own format so long as it contains all of the information in the form. A defendant may use the form provided in Code Section 18-4-82 to file a claim or may use the defendant’s own pleading. When a case involves more than one plaintiff, defendant, or garnishee, or necessitates the inclusion of additional information, the form may be expanded to allow for the information pertaining to all parties and such additional information to be displayed. Each summons of garnishment issued in an action shall display in the caption the name of the garnishee on whom that summons is to be served.

The certificates of service provided within the forms in this article are included as examples. A party may modify a certificate of service in accordance with the circumstances of the case, including, but not limited to, transmission by email as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 9-11-5 or by court rule.

A court may combine multiple forms.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 24/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “plaintiff, defendant, or garnishee,” for “plaintiff or defendant” in the third sentence and added the fourth sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “email” for “e-mail” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

18-4-71.
Affidavit of garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) E-mail Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

AFFIDAVIT OF GARNISHMENT • Check this box if the Garnishee is a financial institution. • Check this box if garnishment is for the collection of child support or alimony. See , et seq. O.C.G.A. §

18-4-50

Personally appeared , who on oath says: (Print name) 1. I am the (Plaintiff) (Attorney at Law for Plaintiff) (Agent for Plaintiff). [Circle one] 2. The Plaintiff obtained a judgment against the Defendant in Case Number in the Court of County, , and State no agreement requires forbearance from the garnishment which is applied for currently. 3. $ is the balance due, which consists of the sum of $ Principal, $ Postjudgment interest, and $ Other (e.g., prejudgment interest, attorney’s fees, costs [exclusive of the cost of this action]). 4. Upon the Affiant’s personal knowledge or belief, the sum stated herein is unpaid. This day of , 20. Affiant Print name of Affiant Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , 20. Notary Public or Deputy Clerk of Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-72.
Affidavit of continuing garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Garnishee: ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) )

Click to view

AFFIDAVIT OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT DO NOT USE THIS FORM FOR A CONTINUING GARNISHMENT FOR CHILD SUPPORT OR ALIMONY. SEE . O.C.G.A. §

18-4-73

Personally appeared , who on oath says: (Print name) 1. I am the (Plaintiff) (Attorney at Law for Plaintiff) (Agent for Plaintiff). [Circle one] 2. The Plaintiff obtained a judgment against the Defendant in Case Number in the Court of County, , and no agreement
State requires forbearance from the garnishment which is applied for currently. 3. $ is the balance due, which consists of the sum of $ Principal, $ Postjudgment interest, and$ Other (e.g., prejudgment interest, attorney’s fees, costs[exclusive of the cost of this action]). 4. Upon the Affiant’s personal knowledge or belief, the sum stated herein is unpaid. 5. The Affiant believes that the Garnishee is an employer of orunder periodic obligations for payment of funds to the Defendant. This day of , 20. Affiant Print name of Affiant Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , 20. Notary Public or Deputy Clerk of Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 25/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or under periodic obligations for payment of funds to” in paragraph (5) of the form.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Email Address” for “E-mail Address” in the form affidavit under “Plaintiff’s contact information”.

18-4-73.
Affidavit of continuing garnishment for support.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTYSTATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

AFFIDAVIT OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT FOR SUPPORT Personally appeared , who on oath says: (Print name) 1. I am the (Plaintiff) (Attorney at Law for Plaintiff) (Agent for Plaintiff). [Circle one] 2. The Plaintiff obtained a judgment against the Defendant in Case Number in the Court of County, , and
State no agreement requires forbearance from the garnishment which is applied for currently. 3. The Affiant states that the Defendant is in arrears on the obligation for support in an amount equal to or in excess of one month’s obligation as decreed in the judgment for support and provides the following information: $ is the amount of arrearage which exists under the judg-ment as of the execution of this affidavit. Check one of the boxes below and complete the requested information: A. • Periodic support is owed for one obligee, or the judgment sets forth a total amount of periodic support for multiple obligees as follows: $ is the total amount of periodic support due for ,
,Name of obligee
Name of obligee and .
Name of obligee Such periodic support is payable on a
E.g., weekly, monthly basis. The termination date of the obliga-tion for periodic support is .
Date
B. • Periodic support is owed for mul-tiple obligees, and the judgment sets forth a different amount of periodic support for each obligee as follows: $ is the total amount of periodic support due for , payable on a Name of obligee basis, E.g., weekly, monthlyand the termination date of such obligation is
Date $ is the total amount of periodic support due for , payable on a Name of obligee basis, E.g., weekly, monthlyand the termination date of such obligation is
Date $ is the total amount of periodic support due for , payable on a Name of obligee basis, E.g., weekly, monthlyand the termination date of such obligation is
Date 4. • Check this box and attach a certified copy of the judgment for support hereto. 5. Upon the Affiant’s personal knowledge or belief, the sum stated herein is unpaid. 6. The Affiant believes that the Garnishee is an employer of or under periodic obligations for payment of funds to the Defendant. This day of , 20. Affiant Print name of Affiant Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , 20. Notary Public or Deputy Clerk of Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 26/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or under periodic obligations for payment of funds to” in paragraph (6) of the form.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Email Address” for “E-mail Address” in the form under “Plaintiff’s contact information”.

18-4-74.
Summons of garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) Garnishment Court information: ) Name ) Street Address ) , Georgia Street Address ) City ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ZIP Code ) ) Phone Number Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

SUMMONS OF GARNISHMENT • Check this box if this is a garnishment for child support or alimony. If this is intended to be a continuing garnishment for support, use the form set forth in . O.C.G.A. §

18-4-80

TO THE ABOVE-NAMED GARNISHEE: Total amount claimed due by the Plaintiff $ Plus court costs due on this summons $ Total garnishment claim $ COURT OF JUDGMENT JUDGMENT CASE NO. to immediately hold all money, including wages, and other property, except what is known to be exempt, including property in safe-deposit boxes or similar property that you hold, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant named above beginning on the day of service of this summons and including the next 29 days. You are to file your answer, in writing, not sooner than 30 days and not later than 45 days from the date you were served with this summons, with the Clerk of this Court and serve a copy of your answer upon the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney named above and the Defendant named above, or the Defendant’s Attorney, if known, at the time of making such answer. Your answer shall state what money, including wages, or other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant you hold beginning on the day of service of this summons and including the next 29 days. Money, including wages, or other property admitted in an answer to be subject to garnishment must be sent or delivered to the Court concurrently with your answer. YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED FURTHER COMMANDED If, in answering this summons, you state that the property of the Defendant includes property in a safe-deposit box or similar property, you shall answer to the Court issuing this summons as to the existence of such safe-deposit box or similar property and shall restrict access to any contents of such safe-deposit box or similar property until further order of such Court regarding the disposition of such contents or 120 days from the date of filing your answer to this summons unless such time has been extended by the Court, whichever is sooner. Should you fail to file a Garnishee Answer as required by this summons, a judgment by default will be rendered against you for the amount remaining due on a judgment as shown in the Plaintiff’s Affidavit of Garnishment. , the Honorable , Judge of said Court. WITNESS This day of , 20. , Clerk of Court By: Deputy Clerk, Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 27/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “be sent” for “be paid” in the last sentence of the Command paragraph in the form.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Email Address” for “E-mail Address” in the form under “Plaintiff’s contact information”.

18-4-75.
Attachment for summons of garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

ATTACHMENT FOR SUMMONS OF GARNISHMENT Other known names of the Defendant: Current and past addresses of the Defendant: Social security number or federal tax identification number of the Defendant: THIS PLEADING SHALL NOT BE FILED WITH THE COURT”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-76.
Summons of garnishment on financial institution.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) Garnishment Court information: ) Name ) Street Address ) , Georgia Street Address ) City ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ZIP Code ) ) Phone Number ) Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

SUMMONS OF GARNISHMENT ON A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION DO NOT USE THIS FORM IF THIS IS A CONTINUING GARNISHMENT (SEE and ) (SEE and ). O.C.G.A. §§

18-4-72

18-4-78

OR CONTINUING GARNISHMENT FOR CHILD SUPPORT OR ALIMONY O.C.G.A. §§

18-4-73

18-4-80

• Check this box if other allegations are made against a nonjudgment Defendant pursuant to . O.C.G.A. §

18-4-23

• Check this box if this is a garnishment for child support or alimony. TO THE ABOVE-NAMED GARNISHEE: Total amount claimed due by the Plaintiff $ Plus court costs due on this summons $ Total garnishment claim $ COURT OF JUDGMENT JUDGMENT CASE NO. to immediately hold all money, including wages, and other property, except what is known to be exempt, including property in safe-deposit boxes or similar property that you hold, belonging to the Defendant named above beginning on the day of service of this summons and including the next five days. You are to file your answer, in writing, not sooner than five days and not later than 15 days after the date you were served with this summons, with the Clerk of this Court and serve a copy of your answer upon the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney named above and the Defendant named above, or the Defendant’s Attorney, if known, at the time of making such answer. Your answer shall state what money, including wages, or other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant you hold beginning on the day of service of this summons and including the next five days. Money, including wages, or other property admitted in an answer to be subject to garnishment must be sent or delivered to the Court concurrently with your answer. YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED FURTHER COMMANDED If, in answering this summons, you state that the property of the Defendant includes property in a safe-deposit box or similar property, you shall answer to the Court issuing this summons as to the existence of such safe-deposit box or similar property and shall restrict access to any contents of such safe-deposit box or similar property until further order of such Court regarding the disposition of such contents or 120 days from the date of filing your answer to this summons unless such time has been extended by the Court, whichever is sooner. Should you fail to file a Garnishee Answer as required by this summons, a judgment by default will be rendered against you for the amount remaining due on the judgment as shown in the Plaintiff’s Affidavit of Garnishment. , the Honorable , Judge of said Court. WITNESS This day of , 20. , Clerk of Court By: Deputy Clerk, Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 28/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “be sent” for “be paid” in the last sentence of the Command paragraph.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Email Address” for “E-mail Address” in the form under “Plaintiff’s contact information”.

18-4-77.
Attachment for summons of garnishment on a financial institution.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

ATTACHMENT FOR SUMMONS OF GARNISHMENT ON A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION Other known names of the Defendant: Current and past addresses of the Defendant: Social security number or federal tax identification number of the Defendant: Account or identification numbers of accounts of the Defendant used by the Garnishee: Other allegations pursuant to : O.C.G.A. §

18-4-23

THIS PLEADING SHALL NOT BE FILED WITH THE COURT”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-78.
Summons of continuing garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) Garnishment Court information: ) Name ) Street Address ) , Georgia Street Address ) City ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ZIP Code ) ) Phone Number ) Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

SUMMONS OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT TO THE ABOVE-NAMED GARNISHEE: Total amount claimed due by the Plaintiff $ Plus court costs due on this summons $ Total garnishment claim $ COURT OF JUDGMENT JUDGMENT CASE NO. to immediately hold all money, including wages, and other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant named above beginning on the day of service of this summons and including the next 1,095 days. You are to file your answer, in writing, not later than 45 days from the date you were served with this summons, with the Clerk of this Court and serve a copy of your answer upon the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney named above and the Defendant named above, or the Defendant’s Attorney, if known, at the time of making such answer. Your answer shall state what money, including wages, or other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant you hold or owe beginning on the day of service of this summons and between the time of such service and the time of making your first answer. Thereafter, you are required to file further answers no later than 45 days after your last answer. Every further answer shall state what money, including wages, and other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant you hold or owe at and from the time of the last answer to the time of the current answer. YOU MUST FILE ADDITIONAL ANSWERS UNTIL THE SOONER OF: THE PAYMENT OF THE BALANCE SHOWN ON THE SUMMONS OF GARNISHMENT, THE EXPIRATION OF 1,095 DAYS, OR THE TERMINATION OF ANY RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN GARNISHEE AND DEFENDANT WHICH INCLUDES PERIODIC PAYMENT OBLIGATIONS FROM GARNISHEE TO DEFENDANT. Money, including wages, or other property admitted in an answer to be subject to continuing garnishment must be sent or delivered to the Court concurrently with each answer. YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED FURTHER COMMANDED Should you fail to file Garnishee Answers as required by this summons, a judgment by default will be rendered against you for the amount remaining due on a judgment as shown in the Plaintiff’s Affidavit of Continuing Garnishment. , the Honorable , Judge of said Court. WITNESS This day of , 20. , Clerk of Court By: Deputy Clerk, Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 29/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first Command paragraph, substituted “1,095 days” for “179 days” in the first sentence, substituted the present sixth sentence for the former provisions, which read: “The last answer required by this summons shall be filed no later than the 195th day after you receive the summons.”, and substituted “be sent” for “be paid” in the seventh sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Email Address” for “E-mail Address” in the form under “Plaintiff’s contact information”.

18-4-79.
Attachment for summons of continuing garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

ATTACHMENT FOR SUMMONS OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT Other known names of the Defendant: Current and past addresses of the Defendant: Social security number or federal tax identification number of the Defendant: THIS PLEADING SHALL NOT BE FILED WITH THE COURT”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-80.
Summons of continuing garnishment for support.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) Garnishment Court information: ) Name ) Street Address ) , Georgia Street Address ) City ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ZIP Code ) ) Phone Number ) Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

SUMMONS OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT FOR SUPPORT GOVERNED BY ARTICLE 3 OF CHAPTER 4 OF TITLE 18 TO THE ABOVE-NAMED GARNISHEE: Total amount claimed due by the Plaintiff $ Plus court costs due on this summons $ Total garnishment claim $ COURT OF JUDGMENT JUDGMENT CASE NO. to immediately hold all money, including wages, and other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant named above beginning on the day of service of this summons until the original arrearage is retired and all periodic support payments are current or until the termination of the garnishment. You are to file your answer, in writing, not later than 45 days from the date you were served with this summons, with the Clerk of this Court and serve a copy of your answer upon the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney named above and the Defendant named above, or the Defendant’s Attorney, if known, at the time of making such answer. Your answer shall state what money, including wages, or other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant you hold or owe beginning on the day of service of this summons and between the time of such service and the time of making your first answer. Thereafter, you are required to file further answers no later than 45 days after your last answer. Every further answer shall state what money, including wages, and other property, except what is known to be exempt, belonging to the Defendant or obligations owed to the Defendant you hold or owe at and from the time of the last answer to the time of the current answer. YOU MUST FILE ADDITIONAL ANSWERS UNTIL THE ORIGINAL ARREARAGE IS RETIRED AND ALL PERIODIC SUPPORT PAYMENTS ARE CURRENT. Money, including wages, or other property admitted in an answer to be subject to continuing garnishment must be sent or delivered to the Court concurrently with each answer. The Plaintiff and the Defendant are required by law to serve you with a copy of any amendment or modification to the original judgment. YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED FURTHER COMMANDED Should you fail to file Garnishee Answers as required by this summons, a judgment by default will be rendered against you for the amount remaining due on a judgment as shown in the Plaintiff’s Affidavit of Continuing Garnishment. , the Honorable , Judge of said Court. WITNESS This day of , 20. , Clerk of Court By: Deputy Clerk, Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 30/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “be sent” for “be paid” in the seventh sentence of the Command paragraph.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Email Address” for “E-mail Address” in the form under “Plaintiff’s contact information”.

18-4-81.
Attachment for summons of continuing garnishment for support.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

ATTACHMENT FOR SUMMONS OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT FOR SUPPORT Other known names of the Defendant: Current and past addresses of the Defendant: Social security number or federal tax identification number of the Defendant: THIS PLEADING SHALL NOT BE FILED WITH THE COURT”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-82.
Notice to defendant of right against garnishment of money, including wages, and other property.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff: ) ) ) Name ) ) Plaintiff’s contact information: ) ) ) Name ) ) Civil Action File No. Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Email Address ) ) Phone Number ) ) Bar Number ) ) v. ) ) Defendant: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code ) ) Garnishee: ) ) ) Name ) ) Street Address ) ) City
State
ZIP Code )

Click to view

NOTICE TO DEFENDANT OF RIGHT AGAINST GARNISHMENT OF MONEY, INCLUDING WAGES, AND OTHER PROPERTY You received this notice because money, including wages, and other property belonging to you have been garnished to pay a court judgment against you. HOWEVER, YOU MAY BE ABLE TO KEEP YOUR MONEY, INCLUDING WAGES, OR OTHER PROPERTY. READ THIS NOTICE CAREFULLY. State and federal law protects some money, including wages, from garnishment even if it is in a bank. Some common exemptions are benefits from social security, supplemental security income, unemployment, workers’ compensation, the Veterans’ Administration, state pension, retirement funds, and disability income. This list of exemptions does not include all possible exemptions. A more detailed list of exemptions is available at the Clerk of Court’s office located at (Name of Court), (Address), (City), Georgia (ZIP Code), and on the website for the Attorney General (). www.law.ga.gov Garnishment of your earnings from your employment is limited to the lesser of 25 percent of your disposable earnings for a week or the amount by which your disposable earnings for a week exceed $217.50. More than 25 percent of your disposable earnings may be taken from your earnings for the payment of child support or alimony or if a Chapter 13 bankruptcy allows a higher amount. TO PROTECT YOUR MONEY, INCLUDING WAGES, AND OTHER PROPERTY FROM BEING GARNISHED, YOU MUST:
1. Complete the Defendant’s Claim Form as set forth below; and
2. File this completed claim form with the Clerk of Court’s office located at (Name of Court), (Address), (City), Georgia (ZIP Code). FILE YOUR COMPLETED CLAIM FORM AS SOON AS POSSIBLE. You may lose your right to claim an exemption if you do not file your claim form within 20 days after the Garnishee’s Answer is filed or if you do not mail or deliver a copy of your completed claim form to the Plaintiff and the Garnishee at the addresses listed on this notice. The Court will schedule a hearing within ten days from when it receives your claim form. The Court will mail you the time and date of the hearing at the address that you provide on your claim form. You may go to the hearing with or without an attorney. You will need to give the Court documents or other proof that your money is exempt. The Clerk of Court cannot give you legal advice. IF YOU NEED LEGAL ASSISTANCE, YOU SHOULD SEE AN ATTORNEY. If you cannot afford a private attorney, legal services may be available. DEFENDANT’S CLAIM FORM I CLAIM EXEMPTION from garnishment. Some of my money or property held by the garnishee is exempt because it is: (check all that apply)
• 1. Social security benefits.
• 2. Supplemental security income benefits.
• 3. Unemployment benefits.
• 4. Workers’ compensation.
• 5. Veterans’ benefits.
• 6. State pension benefits.
• 7. Disability income benefits.
• 8. Money that belongs to a joint account holder.
• 9. Child support or alimony.
• 10. Exempt wages, retirement, or pension benefits.
• 11. Exemptions for taxes due on income or earnings not subject
to employer withholding.
• 12. Other exemptions as provided by law. Explain: I further state: (check all that apply)
• 1. The Plaintiff does not have a judgment against me.
• 2. The amount shown due on the Plaintiff’s Affidavit of Garnish-
ment is incorrect.
• 3. The Plaintiff’s Affidavit of Garnishment is untrue or legally
insufficient. Send the notice of the hearing on my claim to me at: Address: Phone Number: Email Address: The statements made in this claim form are true to the best of my knowledge and belief. , 20 Defendant’s signature
Date Print name of Defendant CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney and the Garnishee in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Defendant or Defendant’s Attorney”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 7/SB 194; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 30A/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted “$217.50” for “$217.00” in the form.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Email” for “E-mail” twice, and, under the heading “Defendant’s Claim Form”, added paragraph 11 and redesignated former paragraph 11 as present paragraph 12.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “United States mail” for “United States Mail” in the form under “CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE”.

18-4-83.
Order for hearing on defendant’s claim.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

ORDER FOR HEARING ON DEFENDANT’S CLAIM It is hereby ordered that a hearing be held upon the Defendant’s claim before this court on the day of , 20, at : . M., and that the Clerk of Court shall transmit a copy of the Defendant’s Claim Form and this order to the Plaintiff, the Defendant, and the Garnishee. This day of , 20. Judge, Court of County CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney, the Defendant, and the Garnishee in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States Mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Deputy Clerk of Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-84.
Garnishee answer.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

GARNISHEE ANSWER OF (GARNISHEE) 1. At the time of service or from the time of service to the time of this Garnishee Answer, the Garnishee had in its possession the following described property of the Defendant: 2. At the time of service or from the time of service to the time of this Garnishee Answer, all obligations accruing from the Garnishee to the Defendant are in the amount of $. 3. $ is the amount herewith paid into court. 4. The Garnishee further states: . Garnishee, Garnishee’s Attorney, or officer or employee of an entity Garnishee CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney and the Defendant or Defendant’s Attorney in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Garnishee, Garnishee’s Attorney, or officer or employee of an entity Garnishee”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 31/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “OF
_______________
(GARNISHEE)” in the form catchline.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “United States mail” for “United States Mail” in the form under “CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE”.

18-4-85.
Financial institution garnishee answer.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

FINANCIAL INSTITUTION GARNISHEE ANSWER OF (GARNISHEE) 1. At the time of service of the Summons of Garnishment on a Financial Institution and including the next five days, the Garnishee had in its possession the following described money and property of the Defendant: 2. $ is the amount herewith paid into court. 3.
• Check this box if the Defendant is not presently an account holder of the Garnishee. 4. The Garnishee further states: . Garnishee, Garnishee’s Attorney, or officer or employee of an entity Garnishee CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney and the Defendant or Defendant’s Attorney in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Garnishee, Garnishee’s Attorney, or officer or employee of an entity Garnishee”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 32/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “OF
_______________
(Garnishee)” in the heading “Financial Institution Garnishee Answer”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “United States mail” for “United States Mail” in the form under “CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE”.

18-4-86.
Garnishee answer to continuing garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

GARNISHEE ANSWER OF (GARNISHEE) TO CONTINUING GARNISHMENT 1. From the time of service of the Summons of Continuing Garnish-ment, if this is the first Garnishee Answer to such summons, otherwise from the time of the last Garnishee Answer to the Summons of Continuing Garnishment until the time of this Garnishee Answer, the Garnishee had in the Garnishee’s possession the following described property of the Defendant: 2. From the time of service of the Summons of Continuing Garnish-ment, if this is the first Garnishee Answer to such summons, otherwise from the time of the last Garnishee Answer to the Summons of Continuing Garnishment until the time of this Garnishee Answer, all obligations accruing from the Garnishee to the Defendant are in the amount of $. 3. $ of the amount named in paragraph 2 were wages earned at the rate of $ per for the period beginning , 20, through the time of making this Date Garnishee Answer. The amount of wages which is subject to this garnishment is computed as follows: $ Gross earnings $ Total social security and withholding tax and other
mandatory deductions required by law $ Total disposable earnings $ Amount of wages subject to garnishment. 4. $ is the amount herewith paid into court. 5. • Check this box if the Defendant is not presently employed by or owed periodic payments by the Garnishee. 6. • Check this box if the Defendant was employed by or owed periodic payments by the Garnishee on or after service of the Summons of Continuing Garnishment but was terminated as of , 20. Date 7. • Check this box if this is the last Garnishee Answer this Garnishee is required to file to the presently pending Summons of Garnishment in the above-styled case. 8. The Garnishee further states: Garnishee, Garnishee’s Attorney, orofficer or employee of an entity Garnishee CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney and the Defendant or Defendant’s Attorney in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Garnishee, Garnishee’s Attorney, orofficer or employee of an entity Garnishee

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 33/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Garnishee Answer of
_______________
(Garnishee) To Continuing Garnishment” for “Garnishee Answer To Continuing Garnishment”; and inserted “or owed periodic payments by” in paragraphs 5 and 6 of the form.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “United States mail” for “United States Mail” in the form under “CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE”.

18-4-87.
Plaintiff’s traverse.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

PLAINTIFF’S TRAVERSE Now comes the Plaintiff in the above-styled case and traverses the Garnishee Answer or Motion to Modify Default Judgment by saying the same is untrue or legally insufficient. The Plaintiff further states: . Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Defendant and the Garnishee in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-87

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 34/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or Motion to Modify Default Judgment” in the first paragraph under the heading “Plaintiff’s Traverse”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “United States mail” for “United States Mail” in the form under “CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE”.

18-4-88.
Third-party claim.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

THIRD-PARTY CLAIM Personally appeared , who on oath says that he or she has a claim superior to that of the Plaintiff to the money or other property in the hands of the Garnishee subject to the process of garnishment.
(Print name) The Affiant further states: (check applicable box and complete the information requested) • The Affiant obtained a judgment against the Defendant in the Court of County, , inState
Case Number on , and the unpaid balance Dateof such judgment is in the amount of $.
or • The basis of the Affiant’s claim is This day of , 20. Affiant Print name of Affiant Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , 20. Notary Public or Deputy Clerk of Court CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney, the Defendant, and the Garnishee in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States Mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Third-party Claimant or Third-party Claimant’s Attorney”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-88

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.